Illinois, session 104th, HB1520.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Wage Payment and Collection Act is 5amended by changing Section 15 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 115/15)  (from Ch. 48, par. 39m-15)7    Sec. 15. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as 8the Illinois Wage Payment and Collection Act.9(Source: P.A. 78-914.)